Illinois, session 104th, SB4167.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 27 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/27)7    Sec. 27. Prepare for Illinois' Future Program. 8    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Illinois Student 9Assistance Commission shall as soon as is practicable, develop 10and implement a Prepare for Illinois' Future Program to offer 11comprehensive test preparation and professional licensure 12preparation, free of charge and at no cost to students, with a 13goal of serving all students at institutions of higher 14education. If funding for the program is insufficient to 15support universal access, then the Commission may prioritize 16offering the services to recipients of the Monetary Award 17Program grant assistance under Section 35 of this Act.18    (b) The Program shall offer students, at a minimum, test 19preparation services for the Medical College Admission Test, 20the Law School Admission Test, the Graduate Record 21Examination, the Graduate Management Admission Test, the Test 22of Essential Academic Skills, and other preparation programs 23for professional exams that may include, but are not limited   SB4167- 2 -LRB104 20985 LNS 34851 b1to, exams for nursing, teaching, real estate, securities, and 2law, insurance, allied health care, emergency medical 3services, firefighting, and fitness and wellness services. The 4program may also provide preparation for credentials such as, 5but not limited to, the Securities Industry Essentials Exam, a 6Financial Paraplanner Qualified Professional exam, and a 7Wealth Management Specialist exam. In establishing the 8Program, the Commission may shall consider, among other 9factors, whether a vendor can provide test preparation for 10multiple admission and professional exams. However, the 11Commission may not require a vendor to provide test 12preparation for all such admission and professional exams the 13test and licensure exam preparation and credentialing programs 14can be provided by a single vendor.15    (c) The Commission shall report to the General Assembly 16and Governor on the Program's usage as soon as is practicable 17after the Program has been in place for at least one academic 18year. To the extent that appropriate data is available, the 19Commission shall also report information on the program's 20effectiveness, with a goal of providing multi-stage research 21to gauge the impact of this investment on in-state university 22recruitment and retention, the State's talent pipeline, and 23the longitudinal value provided to State students. 24Institutions of higher education shall provide information to 25the Commission as needed to facilitate completion of this 26report.  SB4167- 3 -LRB104 20985 LNS 34851 b1(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.)